Florida, session 2026, HB249.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. Section 15.0465, Florida Statutes, is amended
to read:
15.0465 Official state flagship.—The S.S. American
Victory, a 455-foot historic steamship, built in 1944 schooner
Western Union, a 130-foot historic sailing vessel of the tall
ship class, built in Key West and first launched in 1939, is
designated the official state flagship.
Section 2. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026.
Page 1 of 1
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb249 -01-er